New Jersey, session 222, A3176.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   Section 2 of P.L.1997, c.357 (C.27:25-5.7) is amended to read as follows: 2.   a. The use of a rail passenger service by a person shall constitute an agreement by the person to pay the prescribed fare for the service.  A person who has paid the prescribed fare for a rail passenger service and who has been issued proof of payment therefor shall retain that proof of payment while in a pre-paid fare area or on designated rail passenger facilities or vehicles. b.   The proof of payment issued pursuant to this section shall not require any additional validation in order to serve as valid proof of payment for the applicable fare.  The proof of payment shall clearly state the rail passenger service line or lines and the specific duration for which the proof of payment is valid.  An authorized employee or fare enforcement officer may require a customer to display the proof of payment, which shall be valid pursuant to the terms stated on the proof of payment, however, no additional actions by the purchaser shall be necessary in order for the purchaser to be in compliance with the provisions of section 3 of P.L.1997, c.357 (C.27:25-5.8). (cf: P.L.1997, c.357, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately, but shall remain inoperative for 90 days following the date of enactment.